docs/apertium-krl.krl.lexc.md
| laulaja (n) |
| lauloa (vblex) |
| laulu#mua (n) |
| laulu (n) |
| laulu (n) |
| laušeh (n) |
| lava (n) |
| Ledn’ova (np) (ant ) (f ) |
| lehti (n) |
| leikata (vblex) |
| Lemminkäini (np) (ant ) (m ) |
| Lenin (np) (cog ) |
| Lenta (np) (al ) |
| lenteä (vblex) |
| lento#yhteyš (n) |
| Levin (np) (top ) |
| levähellä (vblex) |
| libo (adv) |
| libo (cnjcoo) |
| liettualaini (adj) |
| liikenneh#ministeri (n) |
| liikenneh#yhteyš (n) |
| liitto (n) |
| liittymini (n) |
| liittyä (vblex) |
| liittyö (vblex) |
| linjaauto#yhteyš (n) |
| linna (n) |
| lintu (n) |
| lippu (n) |
| lisyä (adv) |
| lisäkši (post) |
| lisä#tieto (n) |
| lišäytyö (vblex) |
| livvin#karjala (n) |
| livvin#kieline (adj) |
| Lobačov (np) (cog ) |
| Loginova (np) (cog ) |
| loitommakši (adv) |
| loma (n) |
| lopettamini (n) |
| lopettoa (vblex) |
| loppu#konsertti (n) |
| loppuni (adj) |
| loppu (n) |
| loppuo (vblex) |
| Lotos (np) (al ) |
| Louhi (np) (ant ) |
| luajittu (adj) |
| luatie (vblex) |
| L’udmila (np) (ant ) (f ) |
| luiskahtoa (vblex) |
| lujah (adv) |
| lujentamini (n) |
| lukie (vblex) |
| lukija (n) |
| Lumikello (np) (al ) |
| luokka (n) |
| luokše (post) |
| luomis#kilpailu (n) |
| luomis#työ (n) |
| luomis#työ (n) |
| luona (post) |
| luonnollini (adj) |
| luonnon#šiätijö (n) |
| luonto (n) |
| luo (post) |
| luota (post) |
| luova (adj) |
| lupauš (n) |
| luuvva (vblex) |
| luvata (vblex) |
| lähičči (post) |
| lähtie (vblex) |
| lämmin (adj) |
| lämpimäšti (adv) |
| läpičči (post) |
| läššä (adv) |
| läššä#olija (n) |
| Lönnrot (np) (cog ) |
| löyteä (vblex) |
| löyteä (vblex) |
| löytyä (vblex) |
| m€ (sym) |
| M€ (sym) |
| maa (n) |
| mahollini (adj) |
| mahollisuš (n) |
| mahtava (adj) |
| Maikki (np) (ant ) (f ) |
| mainijo (adj) |
| maitotehaš (n) |
| makie (adj) |
| Maksim (np) (ant ) (m ) |
| malli (n) |
| malli (n) |
| malmi (n) |
| malttoa (vblex) |
| mamma (n) |
| Manala (np) (top ) |
| Manilova (np) (cog ) |
| Mari (np) (ant ) (f ) |
| Mari (np) (top ) |
| marju (n) |
| matka (n) |
| matka (n) |
| Matvei (np) (ant ) (m ) |
| meččä#tie (n) |
| mečän#haltija (n) |
| mečästäjä (n) |
| mehövä (adj) |
| meininki (n) |
| Melentjeva (np) (cog ) |
| melkein (adv) |
| melko (adv) |
| melličä (n) |
| melukaš (adj) |
| merkitä (vblex) |
| merkki (n) |
| metri (n) |
| miehol’a (n) |
| mielelläh (adv) |
| mielelläni (adv) |
| mielikuvituš (n) |
| mieli (n) |
| mieli#pito (n) |
| miellytteä (vblex) |
| miellyttävä (adj) |
| mie (prn) (pers ) (p1 ) (sg ) |
| mieš (n) |
| miettie (vblex) |
| miettimine (n) |
| miljardi (num) (card ) |
| miljon (num) (card ) |
| mimmoni (adj) |
| minerali (n) |
| minerali#tuotanto (n) |
| ministeri (n) |
| mintäh (adv) |
| minä (prn) (use _dialect ) (pers ) (p1 ) |
| mi (prn) (itg ) |
| Mirja (np) (ant ) (f ) |
| Mišin (np) (cog ) |
| mitailla (vblex) |
| mitali (n) |
| mitein (adv) |
| mitänä (prn) (ind ) (sg ) (nom ) |
| miärä (n) |
| Moberg (np) (cog ) |
| moldavijalaini (adj) |
| molompi (prn) |
| moni (prn) (ind ) |
| monipuolisešti (adv) |
| monipuolisus (n) |
| mono#kaupunki (n) |
| Mordouvia (np) (top ) |
| Moškova (np) (top ) |
| muajilma (n) |
| muamo (n) |
| mua (n) |
| Mugačeva (np) (cog ) |
| muhie (vblex) |
| muistelehtoa (vblex) |
| muisto#merkki (n) |
| muisto#merkki (n) |
| mukah (post) |
| mukava (adj) |
| muoto (n) |
| Murmanšk (np) (top ) |
| murre (n) |
| musiikki#kollektiivi (n) |
| musiikki (n) |
| musiikki#šoitin (n) |
| muu (prn) (ind ) |
| muuttumini (n) |
| muuvalla (adv) |
| muuvvalla (adv) |
| muuvvalta (adv) |
| myö (prn) (pers ) (p1 ) (pl ) |
| myöten (post) |
| myöten (post) |
| männä (vblex) |
| mätäš (n) |
| Nadežda (np) (ant ) |
| naine (n) |
| naine (n) |
| nakru (n) |
| nauha (n) |
| neito (n) |
| n’el’l’ä (num) (card ) |
| nelläš (adj) (ord ) |
| ne (prn) (dem ) |
| nerokaš (adj) |
| nero (n) |
| Nesterenko (np) (cog ) |
| netti#šivu (n) |
| neuvottelu (n) |
| ni (cnjsub) |
| niekka (n) |
| niemi#mua (n) |
| niin (adv) |
| niise (adv) |
| Nikiforov (np) (cog ) |
| Nikolai (np) (ant ) (m ) |
| nikonša (adv) |
| nimeltäh (post) |
| nimetä (vblex) |
| nimi (n) |
| Nina (np) (ant ) (f ) |
| noin (adv) |
| № (n) (abbr ) |
| noššattoa (vblex) |
| noštoa (vblex) |
| noštoa (vblex) |
| noštua (vblex) |
| noušša (vblex) |
| nuapuri (n) |
| numero (n) |
| nuo (prn) (dem ) |
| nuori (adj) |
| nuoriso (n) |
| nykyaikaini (adj) |
| nyky#ihmini (n) |
| nykyjäh (adv) |
| nykyjähki (adv) |
| nyt (adv) |
| nähtävyš (n) |
| nähtävyš (n) |
| nähä (vblex) |
| näin (adv) |
| näkyvih (adv) |
| näkömyš (n) |
| nämä (prn) (dem ) |
| näppi (n) |
| näyttely (n) |
| näytteä (vblex) |
| näytteä (vblex) |
| näytteä (vblex) |
| näyttyä (vblex) |
| näyttyä (vblex) |
| ohjelma (n) |
| oikein (adv) |
| oikeuš (n) |
| oikie (adj) |
| okša (n) |
| Olga (np) (ant ) (f ) |
| olka#piä (n) |
| olka-piä (n) |
| olla (vaux) |
| oma (adj) |
| omaperäisys (n) |
| omatoimini (adj) |
| omissettu (adj) |
| omistaja (n) |
| omistaja (n) |
| omistoa (vblex) |
| ommella (vblex) |
| ooppera#talo (n) |
| opaššuš#laitoš (n) |
| opaštua (vblex) |
| opaštuja (n) |
| opaštuo (vblex) |
| opastus#ala (n) |
| open (x) |
| oppie (vblex) |
| oppi#kirja (n) |
| oraš#kuu (n) |
| Orlov (np) (top ) |
| ošallistuja (n) |
| ošallistuo (vblex) |
| oša (n) |
| ošanottaja (n) |
| ošašto (n) |
| Ostankin (np) (top ) |
| ottoa (vblex) |
| ottua (vblex) |
| ottuo (vblex) |
| OY (n) (acr ) |
| paha (adj) |
| pahoin (adv) |
| paikallini (adj) |
| paikkakunta (n) |
| paikka (n) |
| paikka (n) |
| painoa (vblex) |
| painuo (vblex) |
| paissa (vblex) |
| paistoa (vblex) |
| paja (n) |
| pajun#taimen (n) |
| pakenomini (n) |
| pakina (n) |
| pakkaispäivä (n) |
| palačči (n) |
| palačči#ranta#katu (n) |
| Palmgren (np) (cog ) |
| pankka (n) |
| panna (vblex) |
| parantoa (vblex) |
| paremmin (adv) |
| Parfenčikov (np) (cog ) |
| Pariisi (np) (ant ) |
| Pariisi (np) (top ) |
| pari (num) (card ) |
| partn’ori (n) |
| passipo (ij) |
| passipo (n) |
| patriotismi (n) |
| pedagogine (adj) |
| peitteä (vblex) |
| pelaštaja (n) |
| pelaštoa (vblex) |
| pelata (vblex) |
| peli (n) |
| pelletti#miärä (n) |
| peluaja (n) |
| peluamini (n) |
| peluata (vblex) |
| penkki (n) |
| pereh (n) |
| perinneh (n) |
| perintehellini (adj) |
| perintö (n) |
| permin#kieline (adj) |
| persona (n) |
| peruštoa (vblex) |
| petoš (n) |
| Petri (np) (ant ) (m ) |
| PetropavlovskKamčatski (np) (top ) |
| petroskoilaini (adj) |
| Petroskoi (np) (top ) |
| Petru (np) (ant ) |
| piekšu (n) |
| pieni (adj) |
| piiplija (n) |
| piiri (n) |
| piirua (n) |
| piiruššuš#kilpailu (n) |
| piiruššuš (n) |
| Piiteri (np) (top ) |
| Piiteri (np) (top ) |
| pikkaraini (adj) |
| pimie#kuu (n) |
| pisteh (n) |
| pistyh (adv) |
| pitemmälti (adv) |
| piteä (vblex) |
| piteä (vblex) |
| pitin (post) |
| Pitkäranta (np) (cog ) |
| pito (n) |
| pito (n) |
| pituni (adj) |
| pityä (vblex) |
| pitälti (adv) |
| piä#aihe (n) |
| piä (n) |
| piä#rakennuš (n) |
| piäššä (post) |
| piäššä (post) |
| piäštä (post) |
| piästä (vblex) |
| piäštä (vblex) |
| piätteä (vblex) |
| piätöš (n) |
| PKC (np) (al ) (acr ) |
| planetta (n) |
| pohjalla (post) |
| Pohjoiskello (np) (al ) |
| pohjois#piiri (n) |
| Pohjola (np) (top ) |
| pohjone (adj) |
| pohjone (n) |
| poika (n) |
| poikki (post) |
| poikkoseh (adv) |
| poimenta (n) |
| poimie (vblex) |
| Polenov (np) (cog ) |
| polvi (n) |
| popularisointi (n) |
| porkkana (n) |
| Potapovo (np) (top ) |
| projekta (n) |
| projekti (n) |
| projektu (n) |
| proplema (n) |
| Prošenko (np) (cog ) |
| pruas#niekka (n) |
|   |
|   |
| Puavali (np) (ant ) (m ) |
| puittehis (post) |
| puna#juuri (n) |
| / (punct) (n ) |
| - (punct) |
|  ! (punct) |
| ? (punct) |
|  ! (punct) |
|  " (punct) |
|  " (punct) |
|   |
|  ; (punct) |
|  ( (punct) |
| ) (punct ) |
| ' (punct) |
| ' (punct) |
| ( !) (punct) |
| ( (punct) |
| (?) (punct) |
| ) (punct) |
| * (punct) |
| , (punct) |
| - (punct) |
| -- (punct) |
| . (punct) |
| .. (punct) |
| ... (punct) |
| .... (punct) |
| ? (punct) |
| [ (punct) |
| ] (punct) |
| ` (punct) |
| { (punct) |
| } (punct) |
| ¡ (punct) |
| « (punct) |
| « (punct) |
| ´ (punct) |
| » (punct) |
| » (punct) |
| ¿ (punct) |
| ˗ (punct) |
| – (punct) |
| — (punct) |
| ― (punct) |
| ’ (punct) |
| ’ (punct) |
| “ (punct) |
| ” (punct) |
| ” (punct) |
| ‥ (punct) |
| … (punct) |
| ‹ (punct) |
| › (punct) |
| puolalaini (adj) |
| puoleheš (adv) |
| puolella (post) |
| puolešta (post) |
| puoli (n) |
| puolitoista (num) (card ) |
| pureškella (vblex) |
| Puudož (np) (top ) |
| puukko (n) |
| puunjaloššuš (n) |
| päih (adv) |
| päin (post) |
| päissä (adv) |
| päivä#koti (n) |
| päivän#kakkara#ryhmä (n) |
| päivä (n) |
| rahvahan#luomis#työ (n) |
| rahvahan#tapa (n) |
| rahvaš (n) |
| Raisa (np) (ant ) (f ) |
| raja (n) |
| rakennuš (n) |
| rakentamini (n) |
| rakentoa (vblex) |
| rauhallini (adj) |
| rauta#malmi#esiintymä (n) |
| rauta#malmi (n) |
| rauta#malmi#pelletti (n) |
| rauta#malmi#tuottaja (n) |
| rehellini (adj) |
| rekonstruointi (n) |
| remontti (n) |
| Remšujeva (np) (top ) |
| restaurointi#työ (n) |
| rikka#ruoho (n) |
| rikkuo (vblex) |
| Rinkevič (np) (cog ) |
| rinnalla (post) |
| rinnalta (post) |
| roikkuo (vblex) |
| rooli (n) |
| Rooma (np) (top ) |
| ropehelline (n) |
| roveh (n) |
| ruado (n) |
| ruado (n) |
| ruataja (n) |
| ruato (n) |
| ruato (n) |
| ruatuo (vblex) |
| runo#kylä (n) |
| runon#laulaja (n) |
| runo (n) |
| ruoho (n) |
| ruoka#tavara (n) |
| rupl’a (n) |
| rupla (n) |
| rušappo (adj) |
| rutompah (adv) |
| ruttoh (adv) |
| ruveta (vblex) |
| ryhmä (n) |
| ryhtyö (vblex) |
| Saha (np) (top ) |
| saitti (n) |
| šakšalaine (n) |
| šalvata (vblex) |
| šama (adj) |
| šamanmielini (adj) |
| šamanmoini (adj) |
| šammuttoa (vblex) |
| šammuttua (vblex) |
| Samoa (np) (top ) |
| šamoin (adv) |
| Šampo (np) (ant ) (m ) |
| šana (n) |
| šanoa (vblex) |
| Santra (np) (ant ) (f ) |
| šanuo (vblex) |
| šanuo (vblex) |
| šata (num) (card ) |
| šattuma (n) |
| sattuo (vblex) |
| Scania (np) (al ) |
| seiččemen (num) (card ) |
| seiččemeš (adj) (ord ) |
| seikkailu (n) |
| šeikkailu#peli (n) |
| šeikka (n) |
| Šeina (np) (cog ) |
| šeisatuš (n) |
| šeisuo (vblex) |
| šejašša (adv) |
| šekaviestihiihto (n) |
| šekä (cnjcoo) |
| šelitteä (vblex) |
| šelittyä (vblex) |
| šelvä (adj) |
| šemmoini (adj) |
| semmoni (adj) |
| šemmoni (adj) |
| Sem’onova (np) (cog ) |
| sentäh (adv) |
| še (prn) (dem ) |
| Sergei (np) (ant ) (m ) |
| šeura (n) |
| šeurašša (post) |
| šeuruava (adj) |
| šeutu (n) |
| Sidnei (np) (top ) |
| šielu (n) |
| šielä (adv) |
| sie (prn) (pers ) (p2 ) (sg ) |
| šiipi (n) |
| šiirtyä (vblex) |
| šijahini (n) |
| šijahini (n) |
| šija (n) |
| šilie (adj) |
| šilmin (adv) |
| šilmä (n) |
| šilta (n) |
| šilti (adv) |
| siti#keškuš (n) |
| šituo (vblex) |
| šituo (vblex) |
| šivu (n) |
| siäkši (n) |
| šiämeh (post) |
| šiämeššä (post) |
| šiämeštä (post) |
| šiännöllini (adj) |
| šiäntö (n) |
| šiäštö (n) |
| šiätijö (n) |
| škola (n) |
| škuappi (n) |
| Slavmo (np) (al ) |
| sointi (n) |
| šointu (n) |
| šoitin (n) |
| šoittaja (n) |
| šoittoa (vblex) |
| šoittu (n) |
| Sokolov (np) (cog ) |
| solo#esityš (n) |
| šopie (vblex) |
| sosiali-talouvellini (adj) |
| spartakiadi (n) |
| spasibo (ij) |
| spektakli (n) |
| Spitsina (np) (cog ) |
| sponsori (n) |
| sponssori (n) |
| Stankevičus (np) (cog ) |
| staraija (vblex) |
| starina#kirja (n) |
| starina#muajilma (n) |
| starinan#kertoja (n) |
| starina (n) |
| starinoija (vblex) |
| State (np) (top ) |
| statussi (n) |
| studentti (n) |
| suaha (vblex) |
| šuaha (vblex) |
| sualeš (n) |
| šuari (n) |
| šuarna (n) |
| šuaten (post) |
| šuati (post) |
| šuhtautumini (n) |
| šuhteh (n) |
| šujuvašti (adv) |
| sukši (n) |
| šuku (n) |
| šula#kuu (n) |
| sul’č'cina (n) |
| šuojella (vblex) |
| suomelane (adj) |
| Suomi (np) (top ) |
| Šuomi (np) (top ) |
| šuo (n) |
| suorah (adv) |
| šuorittoa (vblex) |
| šuorittua (vblex) |
| šuosittu (adj) |
| šuovata (vblex) |
| šuovatta (n) |
| šuunnattu (adj) |
